Illinois, session 104th, HB1117.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Interscholastic Athletic Organization Act 5is amended by adding Section 1.30 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 25/1.30 new)7    Sec. 1.30. Designation of team or sport based on 8biological sex.9    (a) Any athletic team or sport that is under the 10jurisdiction of an association or other entity that has as one 11of its purposes promoting, sponsoring, regulating, or in any 12manner providing for interscholastic athletics or any form of 13athletic competition among schools and students within this 14State must be expressly designated as being: 15        (1) a male athletic team or sport;16        (2) a female athletic team or sport; or17        (3) a coeducational athletic team or sport. 18    (b) An athletic team or sport designated as being female 19is available only to participants who are female, based on 20their biological sex.21    (c) Once each school year and before allowing a student to 22participate on an athletic team or sport, the school district 23or nonpublic school that the student attends shall obtain a   HB1117- 2 -LRB104 05056 LNS 15084 b1written statement verifying all of the following: 2        (1) The student's age.3        (2) The student's biological sex, as ascertained at or 4    before birth in accordance with the student's genetics and 5    reproductive biology.6        (3) That the student is not taking and has not taken 7    during the preceding 12 months any performance enhancing 8    drugs, including anabolic steroids. 9    The statement must be signed by the student's parent or 10guardian if the student is under the age of 18 years or by the 11student if the student is 18 years of age or older. 12    (d) If the school district or nonpublic school that the 13student attends has reasonable cause to believe that any 14information provided in accordance with this Section is false 15or misleading, the school district or nonpublic school may 16remove the student from any sport or athletic team and 17prohibit the student's participation in any sport or on any 18athletic team for the duration of the school year.19    (e) A governmental entity or an association or other 20entity that has as one of its purposes promoting, sponsoring, 21regulating, or in any manner providing for interscholastic 22athletics or any form of athletic competition among schools 23and students within this State may not entertain a complaint, 24open an investigation, or take any adverse action against a 25school district or nonpublic school for maintaining athletic 26teams or sports in accordance with this Section.